California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(d) “Family Urgent Response System” means a coordinated statewide, regional, and county-level system designed to provide collaborative and timely state-level phone-based response and county-level in-home, in-person mobile response during situations of instability, for purposes of preserving the relationship of the caregiver
 and the child or youth, providing developmentally appropriate relationship conflict management and resolution skills, stabilizing the living situation, mitigating the distress of the caregiver or child or youth, connecting the caregiver and child or youth to the existing array of local services, and promoting a healthy and healing environment for children, youth, and families.

(e) “In-home” means the place where the child or youth and caregiver are located, preferably in the home, or at some other mutually agreeable location.

(f) “Instability” means a situation of emotional tension or interpersonal conflict between a caregiver and a child or youth that may threaten their relationship and may lead to a disruption in the current living situation.

(g) “Mobile response” means the provision of in-person, flexible, responsive, and supportive services where the caregiver and child or youth are located to provide them with support and prevent the need for a 911 call or law enforcement contact.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 833, Sec. 1.   (SB 1090)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Conditionally inoperative pursuant to Section 16530.)
-------------------------------------------

16527.

(a) The department shall establish a statewide hotline as the primary entry point for the Family Urgent Response System, which shall be available 24 hours a day, seven days a week, to respond to calls from a caregiver or current or former foster child or youth during moments of instability. Both of the following shall be available through this hotline:

(1) Hotline workers who are trained in techniques for deescalation and conflict resolution telephone response specifically for children or youth impacted by trauma.

(2) Referrals to a county-based mobile response system, established pursuant to Section 16529, for further support
 and in-person response. Referrals shall occur as follows:

(A) A warm handoff whereby the hotline worker establishes direct and live connection through a three-way call that includes the caregiver, child or youth, and county contact. The caregiver, child, or youth may decline the three-way contact with the county contact if they feel their situation has been resolved at the time of the call.

(B) If a direct communication cannot be established pursuant to subparagraph (A), a referral directly to the community- or county-based service and a followup call to ensure that a connection to the caregiver, child, or youth occurs.

(C) The hotline worker shall contact the caregiver and the child or youth within 24 hours after the
 initial call required under subparagraph (A) or (B) to offer additional support, if needed.

(b) The statewide hotline shall maintain contact information for all county-based mobile response systems, based on information provided by counties, for referrals to local services, including, but not limited to, county-based mobile response and stabilization teams.

(c) The department shall ensure that deidentified, aggregated data are collected regarding individuals served through the statewide hotline and county-based mobile response systems and shall publish a report on the department’s internet website by January 1, 2022, and annually by January 1 thereafter, in consultation with stakeholders, including, but not limited to, the County Welfare Directors Association of California, the
 Chief Probation Officers of California, and the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California. The data shall be collected using automated procedures or other matching methods mutually agreed upon by the state and county agencies, including, but not limited to, the statewide child welfare automation management system, and shall include all of the following information:

(1) The number of caregivers served through the hotline, separated by placement type and status as a current or former foster caregiver.

(2) The number of current and former foster children or youth served through the hotline, separated by county agency type, current or former foster care status, age, gender, race, and whether the call was made by the caregiver or the child or youth.

(3) The disposition of each call, including, but not limited to, whether mobile response and stabilization services were provided or a referral was made to other services.

(4) County-based outcome data, including, but not limited to, placement stability, return into foster care, movement from child welfare to juvenile justice, and timeliness to permanency.

(5) The number of calls received by a county-based mobile response system, including calls received through the statewide hotline and portal.

(d) The department may meet the requirements of this section through contract with an entity with
 demonstrated experience in working with populations of children or youth who have suffered trauma and with capacity to provide a 24-hour-a-day, seven-day-a-week response that includes mediation, relationship preservation for the caregiver and the child or youth, and a family-centered and developmentally appropriate approach with the caregiver and the child or youth.

(e) The department, in consultation with stakeholders, including current and former foster youth and caregivers, shall do all of the following:

(1) Develop methods and materials for informing all caregivers and current or former foster children or youth about the statewide hotline, including a dissemination plan for those materials, which shall include, at a minimum, making those materials publicly available
 through the department’s internet website.

(2) Establish protocols for triage and response.

(3) Establish minimum education and training requirements for hotline workers.

(4) Consider expanding the statewide hotline to include communication through electronic means, including, but not limited to, text messaging or email.

(f) (1) The statewide hotline shall be operational no sooner than January 1, 2021, and on the same date as the county mobile response system created pursuant to this chapter.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the statewide hotline may operate sooner than January
 1, 2021, or prior to the date that each county has created a county mobile response system, upon notification from each county to the department that the county satisfies one of the following requirements:

(A) Has established a county mobile response system created pursuant to this chapter.

(B) Has an alternative method to accept and respond to referrals from the statewide hotline pending the establishment of the county mobile response system.

(g) The department shall assist, as needed, the State Department of Health Care Services in exercising its authority pursuant to
 subdivision (b) of Section 16528.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 716, Sec. 1.   (AB 898)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Conditionally inoperative pursuant to Section 16530.)
-------------------------------------------

16528.

(a) The department, in collaboration with the State Department of Health Care Services, and in consultation with the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California, the County Welfare Directors Association of California, child welfare advocates, providers, current or former foster children or youth, and caregivers, shall issue all necessary guidance for county-based mobile response systems for purposes of this chapter, including, but not limited to, data tracking and claiming of federal funding.

(b) The State Department of Health Care Services may submit a Medicaid state plan amendment, waiver request, or both, in order to maximize federal financial participation in implementing this chapter. The State Department of Health Care
 Services shall, in submitting a Medicaid state plan amendment or waiver request, consult with the department, the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California, and the County Welfare Directors Association of California, and consider relevant information from other state systems with mobile response capacity.

(c) To the extent that the Director of Health Care Services determines that federal approval is necessary in order to receive federal financial participation for any portion of the activities to be delivered pursuant to the Family Urgent Response System for which federal funding has been assumed, the implementation of the system shall not occur until the effective date specified in the federal approval obtained by the State Department of Health Care Services. This chapter shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals have been obtained pursuant to subdivision (b) and federal financial
 participation is available for those activities for which federal funding has been assumed, unless state funds are appropriated in the annual Budget Act to implement these activities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 27, Sec. 107.   (SB 80)   Effective June 27, 2019.   Conditionally inoperative pursuant to Section 16530.)
-------------------------------------------

16529.

(a) County child welfare, probation, and behavioral health agencies, in each county or region of counties as specified in subdivision (f), shall establish a joint county-based mobile response system that includes a mobile response and stabilization team for the purpose of providing supportive services to address situations of instability, preserve the relationship of the caregiver and the child or youth, develop healthy conflict resolution and relationship skills, promote healing as a family, and stabilize the situation.

(b) In each county or region of counties, the county child welfare, probation, and behavioral health agencies, in consultation with other relevant county agencies,
 tribal representatives, caregivers, and current or former foster children or youth, shall submit a single, coordinated plan to the department that describes how the county-based mobile response system shall meet the requirements described in subdivision (c). This plan shall be updated and submitted on a biennial basis. The plan shall also describe and include all of the following:

(1) How the county, or region of counties, will track and monitor calls.

(2) Data collection efforts, consistent with
 guidance provided by the department, including, at a minimum, collection of data necessary for the report required pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 16527.

(3) Transitions from mobile response and stabilization services to ongoing services.

(4) A process for identifying if the child or youth has an existing child and family team for coordinating with the child and family team to address the instability, and a plan for ongoing care to support that relationship in a trusting and healing environment.

(5) A process and criteria for determining response.

(6) The composition of the responders, including efforts to include peer partners and those with
 lived experience in the response team, whenever possible.

(7) Both existing and new services that will be used to support the mobile response and stabilization services. County behavioral health departments that operate mobile crisis units may share resources between mobile crisis units and the mobile response system required pursuant to this chapter, at their discretion.

(8) Response protocols for the child or youth in family-based and congregate care settings based on guidelines developed by the department, in consultation with stakeholders, pursuant to Section 16528. The response protocols shall ensure protections for children and youth to prevent placements into congregate care settings, psychiatric institutions, and hospital settings.

(9) A process for identifying whether the child or youth has an existing behavioral health treatment plan and a placement preservation strategy, as described in Section 16010.7, and for coordinating response and services consistent with the plan and strategy.

(10) A plan for the mobile response and stabilization team to provide supportive services in the least intrusive and most child, youth, and family friendly manner, such that mobile response and stabilization teams do not trigger further trauma to the child or youth.

(11) Date of plan submission.

(12) Point-of-contact information for the plan, including name, telephone number, and email
 address.

(c) A county-based mobile response system shall include all of the following:

(1) Phone response at the county level that facilitates entry of the caregivers and current or former foster children or youth into mobile response services.

(2) A process for determining when a mobile response and stabilization team will be sent, or when other services will be used, based on the urgent and critical needs of the caregiver, child, or youth.

(3) A mobile response and stabilization team available 24 hours a day, seven days a week.

(4) Ability to provide immediate,
 in-person, face-to-face response preferably within
 1 hour, but not to exceed 3 hours in extenuating circumstances for urgent needs, or same-day response within 24 hours for nonurgent situations.

(5) Utilization of individuals with specialized training in trauma of children or youth and the foster care system on the mobile response and stabilization team. Efforts should be made to include peer partners and those with lived experience in the response team, whenever possible.

(6) Provision of in-home deescalation, stabilization, and support services and supports, including all of the following:

(A) Establishing in-person, face-to-face contact with the child or youth and caregiver.

(B) Identifying the underlying causes of, and precursors to, the situation that led to the instability.

(C) Identifying the caregiver interventions attempted.

(D) Observing the child and caregiver interaction.

(E) Diffusing the immediate situation.

(F) Coaching and working with the caregiver and the child or youth in order to preserve the family unit and maintain the current living situation or create a healthy transition plan, if necessary.

(G) Establishing connections to other county- or community-based supports and services to ensure continuity of care, including, but not limited to, linkage to
 additional trauma-informed and culturally and linguistically responsive family supportive services and youth and family wellness resources.

(H) Following up after the initial face-to-face response, for up to 72 hours, to determine if additional supports or services are needed.

(I) Identifying any additional support or ongoing stabilization needs for the family and making a plan for, or referral to, appropriate youth and family supportive services within the county.

(7) A process for communicating with the county of jurisdiction and the county behavioral health agency, as applicable, regarding the service needs of the child or youth and caregiver
 provided that the child or youth is currently under the jurisdiction of either the county child welfare or the probation system.

(d) County-based mobile response systems may be temporarily adapted to address circumstances associated with COVID-19, consistent with the Governor’s Proclamation of a State of Emergency, issued on March 4, 2020.

(e) (1) A county-based mobile response system that is not otherwise responding to calls placed through the statewide hotline may utilize mobile response team staff based on local needs, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(A) Engaging in in-person education and outreach.

(B) Responding to local child, youth, or caregiver requests for support.

(C) Providing ongoing support to a child, youth, or caregiver who has received mobile response services.

(D) Responding to calls from children and families during a hotline investigation or who are receiving family preservation or voluntary or court-ordered family maintenance services.

(2) If a county-based mobile response system that is not otherwise responding to calls placed through the statewide hotline chooses to utilize mobile response team staff pursuant
 to paragraph (1), the county-based mobile response system shall prioritize calls placed through the statewide hotline for urgent responses and shall continue to maintain sufficient staffing to ensure county-based mobile response teams maintain compliance with all requirements set forth in subdivision (c).

(f) (1) Each county shall establish a mobile response system no sooner than January 1, 2021, and on the same date as the statewide hotline created under this chapter.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a county may establish a mobile response system, or an alternative method to accept and respond to referrals from the statewide
 hotline, pending the establishment of the county mobile response system, prior to January 1, 2021, in order to facilitate the early operation of the statewide hotline.

(3) The county agencies described in subdivisions (a) and (b) may implement this section on a per-county basis or by collaborating with other counties to establish regional, cross-county mobile response systems. For counties implementing this section pursuant to a regional approach, a single plan, as described in subdivision (b), signed by all agency representatives, shall be submitted to the department and a lead county shall be identified.

(4) Funds expended pursuant to this act shall be used to supplement, and not supplant, other existing funding for mobile response services described in this chapter.

(5) A county or region of counties may receive an extension, not to exceed six months, to implement a mobile response system after January 1, 2021, upon submission of a written request, in a manner to be prescribed by the department, that includes a demonstration of actions to implement, progress towards implementation, and the county’s alternative method to accept and respond to referrals from the statewide hotline pending the establishment of the county mobile response system.

(g) The creation and implementation of the Family Urgent Response System shall not infringe on entitlements or services provided pursuant to Title IV-E of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 670 et seq.) or as defined in
 the federal Early and Periodic Screening, Diagnosis and Treatment services (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396d(r)).

(h) The department, in collaboration with the County Welfare Directors Association of California, the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California, and the Chief Probation Officers of California, on an annual basis beginning on January 1, 2022, shall assess utilization and workload associated with implementation of the statewide hotline and mobile response and provide an update to the Legislature during budget hearings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 716, Sec. 2.   (AB 898)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Conditionally inoperative pursuant to Section 16530.)
-------------------------------------------

16530.

This chapter shall be inoperative in any fiscal year for which funding is not appropriated in the annual Budget Act for the purpose of complying with the requirements of Sections 16527 and 16529.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 86, Sec. 52.   (AB 153)   Effective July 16, 2021.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.5. Child Welfare Leadership and Performance Accountability [16540. - 16545.]

16540.

The California Child Welfare Council is hereby established, which shall serve as an advisory body responsible for improving the collaboration and processes of the multiple agencies and the courts that serve the children and youth in the child welfare and foster care systems. The council shall monitor and report the extent to which child welfare and foster care programs and the courts are responsive to the needs of children in their joint care. The council shall issue advisory reports whenever it deems appropriate, but in any event, no less frequently than annually, to the Governor, the Legislature, the Judicial Council, and the public. A report of the Child Welfare Council shall, at a minimum, include recommendations for all of the following:

(a) Ensuring that all state child welfare, foster care, and judicial funding and services for children, youth, and families is, to the greatest extent possible, coordinated to eliminate fragmentation and duplication of services provided to children or families who would benefit from integrated multiagency services.

(b) Increasing the quality, appropriateness, and effectiveness of program services and judicial processes delivered to children, youth, and families who would benefit from integrated multiagency services to achieve better outcomes for these children, youth, and families.

(c) Promoting consistent program and judicial excellence across counties to the greatest extent possible while recognizing the demographic, geographic, and financial differences among the counties.

(d) Increasing collaboration and coordination between county agencies, state agencies, federal agencies, and the courts.

(e) Ensuring that all state Title IV-E plans, program improvement plans, and court improvement plans demonstrate effective collaboration between public agencies and the courts.

(f) Assisting the Secretary of California Health and Human Services and the chief justice in formulating policies for the effective administration of the child welfare and foster care programs and judicial processes.

(g) Modifying program practices and court processes, rate structures, and other system changes needed to promote and support relative caregivers, family foster parents, therapeutic placements, and other placements for children who cannot remain in the family home.

(h) Developing data- and information-sharing agreements and protocols for the exchange of aggregate data across program and court systems that are providing services to children and families in the child welfare system. These data-sharing agreements shall allow child welfare agencies and the courts to access data concerning the health, mental health, special education, and educational status and progress of children served by county child welfare systems subject to state and federal confidentiality laws and regulations. They shall be developed in tandem with the establishment of judicial case management systems as well as additional or enhanced performance measures described in subdivision (b) of Section 16544.

(i) Developing systematic methods for obtaining policy recommendations from foster youth about the effectiveness and quality of program services and judicial processes, and ensuring that the interests of foster youth are adequately addressed in all policy development.

(j) Implementing legislative enactments in the child welfare and foster care programs and the courts, and reporting to the Legislature on the timeliness and consistency of the implementation.

(k) Monitoring the adequacy of resources necessary for the implementation of existing programs and court processes, and the prioritization of program and judicial responsibilities.

(l) Strengthening and increasing the independence and authority of the foster care ombudsperson.

(m) Coordinating available services for former foster youth and improving outreach efforts to those youth and their families.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 130, Sec. 251.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

16541.

The council shall be comprised of the following members:

(a) The Secretary of California Health and Human Services, who shall serve as cochair.

(b) The Chief Justice of the California Supreme Court, or his or her designee, who shall serve as cochair.

(c) The Superintendent of Public Instruction, or his or her designee.

(d) The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, or his or her designee.

(e) The
 executive director of the State Board of Education.

(f) The Director of Social Services.

(g) The Director of Health Care Services.

(h) The Director of State Hospitals.

(i) The Director of Developmental Services.

(j) The Director of the Youth Authority.

(k) The Administrative Director of the Courts.

(l) The State Foster Care Ombudsperson.

(m) Four foster youth or former foster youth.

(n) The chairpersons of the Assembly Human Services
 Committee and the Assembly Judiciary Committee, or two other Members of the Assembly as appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.

(o) The chairpersons of the Senate Human Services Committee and the Senate Judiciary Committee, or two other members appointed by the President pro Tempore of the Senate.

(p) Leaders and representatives of county child welfare, foster care, health, education, probation, and mental health agencies and departments, child advocacy organizations; labor organizations, recognized professional associations that represent child welfare and foster care social workers, tribal representatives, and other groups and stakeholders that provide benefits, services, and advocacy to families and children in the child welfare and foster care systems, as recommended by representatives of these groups and as designated by the cochairs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 442, Sec. 41.   (SB 1465)   Effective September 18, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

16541.5.

The council shall meet no less frequently than each quarter of the state fiscal year and at the call of the cochairs, at a time and location convenient to the public as it may deem appropriate. All meetings of the council shall be open to the public. Members shall serve without compensation, with the exception of foster youth members, who shall be entitled to reimbursement for all actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 130, Sec. 252.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

16542.

The cochairs may appoint committees composed of council members, experts in specialized fields, foster youth, program stakeholders, state and county child welfare and foster care staff, child advocacy organizations, members of the judiciary, foster care public health nurses, or any combination thereof, to advise the council on any functions of the council and the services provided through the child welfare and foster care programs and the courts. Members of these committees shall receive no compensation from the state for their services, with the exception of foster youth members, who shall be entitled to reimbursement for all actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties. The committees may assemble information and make recommendations to the council, but shall not exercise any of the powers vested in the council. The council may seek input from groups and individuals as it deems appropriate, including, but not limited to, advisory committees, the judiciary and child welfare and foster care program stakeholders.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 130, Sec. 253.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

16543.

Consistent with state and federal law, the council shall have access to aggregate data and information concerning the child welfare and foster care systems held by any state or local department, agency, or court that serves children, youth, and families receiving child welfare and foster care services subject to state and federal confidentiality laws and regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 384, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

16543.5.

It is the intent of the Legislature to inspect other state child welfare and foster care systems over the course of the 2007–08 Legislative Session, for the purpose of examining effective administrative structures of leadership. It is further the intent of the Legislature to conduct legislative hearings through the Assembly Select Committee on Foster Care, and other standing committees, and to review reports and recommendations of other commissions and bodies, including the California Blue Ribbon Commission on Foster Care and the Little Hoover Commission, to determine if a reconfigured administrative structure would provide statewide leadership and coordination between departments and agencies, which are essential to improving outcomes for current and former foster children and youth throughout the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 384, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

16544.

The secretary shall ensure that all of the federal Child and Family Services Review outcome measures and all of the California Child and Family Service Review System outcome indicators, along with any performance goals and federal outcome standards, are clearly posted on the State Department of Social Service’s Internet Web site. Before any of the federal goals or any of the California Child and Family Service Review System outcome indicators are added, deleted, or amended, the secretary shall consult with the Child Welfare Council and ensure that there has been a public process for the submission of comments and recommendations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 384, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

16544.5.

The California Child Welfare Council shall establish a Mandated Reporting Advisory Committee (MRAC). The MRAC shall include, but not be limited to, representatives of county agencies, labor organizations, community-based organizations, and parents and youth directly impacted by the child welfare system. It is the intent of the Legislature that the MRAC ensure the transformation of mandated reporting to community supporting continues and disparities in the child welfare system are eliminated.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 79, Sec. 29.   (SB 119)   Effective July 29, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

16545.

By April 1, 2008, the Judicial Council shall adopt, through rules of court, performance measures designed to complement and promote those measures specified in Section 16544 so that courts are able to measure their performance and track their own progress in improving safety, permanency, timeliness, and well-being of children and to inform decisions about the allocation of court resources. In adopting performance measures, the Judicial Council shall consult with the council and the secretary. The performance measures shall be based on data that is available from current or planned data collection processes and to the greatest extent possible, shall ensure uniformity of data reporting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 130, Sec. 254.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.6. Excellence in Family Finding, Engagement, and Support Program [16546. - 16549.]

16546.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Identifying and engaging family members are critical components of providing effective child welfare services to children who have been removed from their homes due to abuse or neglect.

(b) For Indian children subject to an Indian child custody proceeding, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 224.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, dedicated and specialized efforts for family finding, engagement, and support are critical to promote the stability and security of Indian tribes and families, to comply with the Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq.) and other applicable federal and state law, and to protect the
 best interests of the child.

(c) Often, family members may become caregivers for children or may be able to provide other help and support to children and families on an ongoing basis.

(d) Supporting dedicated and specialized efforts for family finding, engagement, and support has been shown to increase the success of identifying relative caregivers and engaging relatives and other supportive adults to support children and families during and after reunification, and can support permanency in cases where reunification cannot occur. These dedicated and specialized efforts have proven to increase placements with and connections to relatives up front when children first enter out-of-home care, and to increase legal and relational permanency for children who have been in out-of-home care for a longer time.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 573, Sec. 24.   (AB 207)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

16546.5.

(a) Subject to an appropriation of state funds, there is hereby established the Excellence in Family Finding, Engagement, and Support Program. This program shall be administered by the State Department of Social Services.

(b) In administering the program, the department shall do all of the following:

(1) Develop, in consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association of California and the Chief Probation Officers of California, an allocation methodology for counties that elect to receive funds under this section.

(2) On or before March 1, 2023, make funds available to participating counties according to the allocation methodology developed pursuant to paragraph (1).

(c) (1) A county may elect to participate in the program by submitting a written notice to the department in accordance with instructions issued by the department.

(2) A county that elects to participate in the program shall provide a match of local funds, which may include in-kind contributions of services or other resources from the county or community-based organizations, equal to one-half of all state funds provided to the county under the program.

(d) (1) The department shall consult with Indian tribes to develop an allocation methodology and procedures for program
 participation for Indian tribes, consortia of tribes, or tribal organizations, as defined in Section 137.10 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(2) An Indian tribe, consortia of tribes, or tribal organization, as defined in Section 137.10 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, that enters into an agreement with the department pursuant to Section 10553.1 of this code or Section 1919 of Title 25 of the United States Code shall, in accordance with the agreement, be eligible to receive allocations of funds under this section.

(e) Funds allocated under this section and the local match described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) shall be used for specialized permanency work, including culturally responsive, family-centered, and trauma-informed family finding and engagement services. Services shall focus on establishing and maintaining permanent connections for
 foster children. Funded activities shall include any or all of the following:

(1) Training of staff on family finding and engagement practices and models.

(2) Staffing and tools to identify, locate, and engage persons related to the child by blood or marriage, identification and engagement of other family-like relationships, and in the case of an Indian child, to make active efforts to engage with the tribe to determine the child’s extended family members, as defined in Section 224.1. This may include use of internet and social media tools, genograms, database searches, and other technological tools to support family finding.

(3) Outreach and engagement of the child and family team members and all other current and prior service providers, case managers, and other connections to the foster child, to identify and
 engage possible family and family-like connections.

(4) Plan development and case management for the child, family, and family-like connections to identify and address any barriers to establishing or reestablishing positive, loving, and supportive relationships. Counties and participating tribes shall engage children continuously in plan development, case planning, and services of importance to the child.

(5) Implementation of model programs, strategies, or promising practices identified by the department in consultation with tribes, the County Welfare Directors Association of California, the Chief Probation Officers of California, and child and youth advocacy organizations. The model programs, strategies, or promising practices include, but are not limited to, model programs, strategies, or promising practices that focus on up front family finding and engagement and that focus on
 family finding and engagement techniques to find permanent families and relationships for foster children who have been in out-of-home foster care for 24 months or longer, who are not living with a relative, for whom reunification is no longer in the case plan, and who have not been placed with a family who is in the process of adopting them or assuming guardianship over them.

(f) A participating county may elect to contract with a nonprofit community-based organization to provide the services described in this section.

(g) A participating county or contracted nonprofit community-based organization shall employ family-finding workers who have experience or training in family-finding strategies or practice, which may include lived experience.

(h) (1) Family-finding workers shall be assigned to family-finding responsibilities full time but may be employed by either the participating county or a nonprofit community-based organization with which the participating county has contracted for this purpose.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a participating county or tribe without a family-finding worker assigned full time to family-finding responsibilities due to an insufficient caseload, as determined by the department, may submit a written request to the department for authorization to use funding to pay for the portion of a family-finding worker’s time dedicated to family-finding activities. The request shall be submitted in a manner to be prescribed by the department and shall include, at a minimum, the following information:

(A) Caseload information to support the assertion of an insufficient caseload for the worker to be assigned full time to family-finding responsibilities.

(B) The proportion of the family-finding worker’s time assigned to family-finding responsibilities.

(i) A county shall provide information to the department on which of the activities specified in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (e) the participating county has performed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 46, Sec. 50.   (AB 161)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

16547.

(a) (1) The department shall establish procedures for program data collection and reporting.

(2) The department shall consult with Indian tribes that enter into agreements with the department pursuant to Section 10553.1 of this code or Section 1919 of Title 25 of the United States Code to develop procedures for program data collection and reporting for Indian tribes, consortia of tribes, or tribal organizations.

(3) Participating counties shall collect and report program data in accordance with written instructions issued by the department, which shall be determined in consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association of California, the Chief